District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

23-591

Authority to break and enter under certain conditions.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1455, Pub. L. 93-481, § 4(a)
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 93-635, § 16

Cross References

Criminal cases, plan for furnishing representation of indigents, violations of this chapter, see § 11-2601.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-591.